Indiana, session 2026, HB1346.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 15-15-13-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "hemp" means the plant
Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds
thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
concentration (including THCA) of not more than three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis, for any part of the Cannabis
sativa L. plant.
SECTION 2. IC 15-15-13-6.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 104, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter, "hemp
product" means a product derived from, or made by, processing hemp
plants or plant parts including derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids,
isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers. However, the term does not
include:
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107


(1) smokable hemp (as defined by IC 35-48-1.1-38); or
(2) products that contain a total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration (including THCA)
of more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) by weight.
SECTION 3. IC 15-15-13-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) An agricultural hemp seed production
license issued under this chapter authorizes a grower or handler to
produce and handle agricultural hemp seed for sale to licensed hemp
growers and handlers. A seller of agricultural hemp seed shall ensure
that the seed complies with any standards set by the state seed
commissioner. The state seed commissioner shall make available to
growers information that identifies sellers of agricultural hemp seed.
(b) A person who sells agricultural hemp seed to a grower must be
a seed distributor who has a permit under IC 15-15-1-34.
(c) All growers and handlers must keep records in accordance with
rules adopted by the state seed commissioner. Upon at least three (3)
days notice, the state seed commissioner may audit the required records
during normal business hours. The state seed commissioner may
conduct an audit for the purpose of ensuring compliance with:
(1) this chapter;
(2) rules adopted by the state seed commissioner; or
(3) hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production license
requirements, terms, and conditions.
(d) In addition to an audit conducted in accordance with subsection
(c), the state seed commissioner may inspect independently, or in
cooperation with the state police department, a federal law enforcement
agency, or a local law enforcement agency, any hemp crop during the
crop's growth phase and take a representative composite sample for
field analysis. If a crop contains an average
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
concentration (including THCA) exceeding three-tenths of one percent
(0.3%) on a dry weight basis, the state seed commissioner may detain,
seize, or embargo the crop.
(e) The state seed commissioner may revoke a license issued under
this chapter to a person that fails to cooperate with:
(1) the state seed commissioner;
(2) the state police;
(3) a federal law enforcement agency; or
(4) a local law enforcement agency;
in an inspection, or in the taking of a sample, under subsection (d).
(f) A failure to cooperate described in subsection (e) constitutes
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107


probable cause for the state seed commissioner, state police, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency to search the
premises of the licensee's hemp operation.
(g) If the state police department, a federal law enforcement agency,
or a local law enforcement agency cooperates with the state seed
commissioner in the detention, seizure, or embargo of a crop under this
section:
(1) the state police department, federal law enforcement agency,
or local law enforcement agency; and
(2) any officer or employee of the state police department, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency who is
involved in the detention, seizure, or embargo;
is immune from civil liability for the detention, seizure, or embargo.
(h) The state seed commissioner may order a hemp crop that is
detained, seized, or embargoed for noncompliance with this chapter to
be destroyed by the owner. However, except as prohibited by federal
law, the grower may appeal to the state seed commissioner for the
hemp crop to be diverted to a willing licensed processor for processing
and sale for industrial use. A hemp crop that is detained, seized, or
embargoed may not be used for cannabidiol, other extracts, oil, food,
or cosmetic products that are used for humans or animals.
(i) A grower shall reimburse the state seed commissioner for the
cost of testing conducted on the grower's crop under this section.
SECTION 4. IC 15-15-13-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The state seed commissioner is responsible for
the following:
(1) Monitoring the hemp grown by any license holder.
(2) Conducting random testing of the hemp for compliance with
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) levels. The state seed commissioner
may enter into agreements with one (1) or more laboratories
selected by the Indiana state police department to perform testing
under this subdivision.
(3) Establishing necessary testing criteria and protocols, including
a procedure for testing, using post decarboxylation or other
similarly reliable methods, for delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration levels, including
THCA, of the hemp produced.
(4) Establishing the minimum number of acres to be planted
under each license issued under this chapter.
(5) Regulating any propagative material of a hemp plant.
SECTION 5. IC 24-4-21-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107


SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A person may distribute low THC hemp extract
in Indiana only if the distributor has a certificate of analysis prepared
by an independent testing laboratory showing:
(1) that the low THC hemp extract is the product of a batch tested
by the independent testing laboratory;
(2) that the independent testing laboratory determined that the
batch contained not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors, by
weight, meets the requirements of IC 35-48-1.1-27(a)(1)
through IC 35-48-1.1-27(a)(4), based on the testing of a random
sample of the batch; and
(3) the cannabidiol percent present of the low THC hemp extract.
SECTION 6. IC 24-4-21-4, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]:
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), Low THC hemp
extract must be distributed in packaging that contains the following
information:
(1) A scannable bar code or QR code linked to a document that
contains information with respect to the manufacture of the low
THC hemp extract, including the:
(A) batch identification number;
(B) product name;
(C) batch date;
(D) expiration date, which must be not more than two (2) years
from the date of manufacture;
(E) batch size;
(F) total quantity produced;
(G) ingredients used, including the:
(i) ingredient name;
(ii) name of the company that manufactured the ingredient;
(iii) company or product identification number or code, if
applicable; and
(iv) ingredient lot number; and
(H) download link for a certificate of analysis for the low THC
hemp extract.
(2) The batch number.
(3) The Internet address of a web site website to obtain batch
information.
(4) The expiration date.
(5) The number of milligrams of low THC hemp extract.
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107


(6) The manufacturer.
(7) The fact A statement that the product contains not more than
three-tenths percent (0.3%) total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
(THC), including precursors, by weight. meets the requirements
of IC 35-48-1.1-27.
(b) Before July 1, 2018, low THC hemp extract may be distributed
in Indiana without having met the requirements described in subsection
(a).
SECTION 7. IC 35-31.5-2-58.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 58.5. "Consumable hemp
substance", for purposes of IC 35-48-1.1, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-48-1.1-6.5.
SECTION 8. IC 35-31.5-2-61.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 61.5. "Container", for purposes
of IC 35-48-1.1, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-1.1-6.7.
SECTION 9. IC 35-48-1.1-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. "Consumable hemp
substance" means a substance derived from hemp that is intended
to be introduced into a person's body.
SECTION 10. IC 35-48-1.1-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. "Container" means the
innermost wrapping, packaging, vessel, or cartridge in direct
contact with a consumable hemp substance intended for retail sale
to a consumer. The term does not include bulk shipping containers
or outer wrappings that are not essential for the final retail
delivery to a consumer.
SECTION 11. IC 35-48-1.1-27, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) "Low THC hemp extract"
means a substance or compound that:
(1) is derived from or contains any part of the plant Cannabis
sativa L. that meets the definition of hemp under IC 15-15-13-6;
(2) contains not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%), total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol in aggregate:
(A) total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA
and any other precursors; and
(B) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects (or are
marketed to have similar effects) on humans or animals as
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107


THC;
by dry weight; and
(3) does not contain a cannabinoid:
(A) that is not capable of being naturally produced by the
Cannabis sativa L. plant; or
(B) that:
(i) is capable of being naturally produced by the
Cannabis sativa L. plant; and
(ii) was synthesized or manufactured outside the plant;
(3) (4) contains no other controlled substances; and
(5) is not sold or delivered in a container that contains, in
aggregate, more than four-tenths (0.4) of a milligram of:
(A) total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA
and any other precursors; and
(B) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects (or are
marketed to have similar effects) on humans or animals as
THC.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) the harvested reproductive organ, whether immature or
mature, of the female hemp plant; or
(2) smokable hemp.
SECTION 12. IC 35-48-1.1-38, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), "smokable hemp" means a product containing not more
than three-tenths percent (0.3%) delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including THCA and any other
precursors and derivatives of THC, in a form that allows THC to be
introduced into the human body by inhalation of smoke. The term
includes:
(1) hemp bud; and
(2) hemp flower.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) a hemp plant that is; or
(2) parts of a hemp plant that are;
grown or handled by a licensee for processing or manufacturing into a
legal hemp product.
2026 IN 1346—LS 6586/DI 107